Mississippi statutes. Title 47. Prisons and Prisoners; Probation and Parole
Offenders

§ 47-5-110.
Commitments to be to department and not to particular institutions or facilities; transfers of offenders; community prerelease program; conditions; immunity for commissioner of corrections; evidence-based programs for benefit of inmates.

Commitment to any institution or facility within the jurisdiction of the department shall be to the department, not to a particular institution or facility. The commissioner shall assign a newly committed offender to an appropriate facility consistent with public safety; provided, however, that any offender who, in the opinion of the sentencing judge, requires confinement in a maximum security unit shall be assigned, upon initial commitment, to the Parchman facility. The commissioner may extend the place of confinement of eligible offenders as provided under subsection (2) of this section. He may transfer an offender from one (1) institution to another, consistent with the commitment and in accordance with treatment, training and security needs. The commissioner shall have the authority to transfer inmates from the various correctional facilities of the department to restitution centers if such inmates meet the qualifications prescribed in Section 99-37-19. The commissioner shall prepare appropriate standards of eligibility for such transfers of offenders from one (1) institution to another institution and transfers of offenders who meet the qualifications for placement in restitution centers. The commissioner shall have the authority to remove the offenders from restitution centers and to transfer them to other facilities of the department. The commissioner shall obtain the approval of the sentencing court before transferring an offender committed to the department to a restitution center. On the request of the chief executive officer of the affected unit of local government, the commissioner may transfer a person detained in a local facility to a state facility. The commissioner shall determine the cost of care for that person to be borne by the unit of local government. The commissioner may assign to a community work center, any offender who is convicted under the Mississippi Implied Consent Law and who is sentenced to the custody of the Department of Corrections, except that if a death or a serious maiming has occurred during the commission of the violation of the Mississippi Implied Consent Law, then the offender so convicted may not be assigned to a community work center.

The department may establish by rule or policy and procedure a community prerelease program which shall be subject to the following requirements:

The commissioner may extend the limits of confinement of offenders serving sentences for violent or nonviolent crimes who have six (6) months or less remaining before release on parole, conditional release or discharge to participate in the program. Parole violators may be allowed to participate in the program.

Any offender who is referred to the program shall remain an offender of the department and shall be subject to rules and regulations of the department pertaining to offenders of the department until discharged or released on parole or conditional release by the State Parole Board.

The department shall require the offender to participate in work or educational or vocational programs and other activities that may be necessary for the supervision and treatment of the offender.

An offender assigned to the program shall be authorized to leave a community prerelease center only for the purpose and time necessary to participate in the program and activities authorized in paragraph (c) of this subsection.

The commissioner shall have absolute immunity from liability for any injury resulting from a determination by the commissioner that an offender shall be allowed to participate in the community prerelease program.

The department may by rule or policy and procedure provide evidence-based programs for the benefit of inmates, with emphasis on those that are targeted at reducing inmate recidivism and prerelease service for offenders at each of its major correctional facilities: Mississippi State Penitentiary, Central Mississippi Correctional Institution and South Mississippi Correctional Institution and other facilities where the department confines state inmates.

The commissioner may establish prerelease programs at the South Mississippi Correctional Institution. The prerelease program may be located on the grounds of this facility or another facility designated by the commissioner.

For purposes of this subsection, the term “evidence-based programs” shall have ascribed to it the meaning in Section 27-103-159.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1976, ch. 440, § 16; reenacted, Laws, 1981, ch. 465, § 57; reenacted, Laws, 1984, ch. 471, § 53; reenacted, Laws, 1986, ch. 413, § 53; Laws, 1986, ch. 428, § 1; Laws, 1993, ch. 578, § 1; Laws, 1997, ch. 371, § 1; Laws, 2003, ch. 552, § 2; Laws, 2005, ch. 505, § 1; Laws, 2007, ch. 353, § 1; Laws, 2012, ch. 391, § 1; Laws, 2015, ch. 463, § 2, eff from and after July 1, 2015.

§ 47-5-110.1.
Offenders to pay costs of requested transfers between facilities.

Whenever an offender in the custody of the Department of Corrections is transferred, upon request, from one (1) facility to another, the offender must pay to the department an amount equal to Forty Cents ($.40) per mile for each mile traveled from the transferor facility to the transferee facility or Twenty-five Dollars ($25.00), whichever is greater, to cover the costs of the transfer. An offender may not be required to pay for the costs of any transfer that is initiated by the Department of Corrections.

HISTORY:
Laws, 2002, ch. 624, § 12; Laws, 2005, ch. 370, § 1, eff from and after passage (approved Mar. 15, 2005.).

§ 47-5-110.2.
Persons sentenced to custody of department after January 1, 2017, can no longer be sentenced to regimented inmate discipline program.

From and after January 1, 2017, no person to be sentenced to the custody of the Mississippi Department of Corrections shall be ordered to a Regimented Inmate Discipline (RID) program by any court of this state. The Department of Corrections shall either operate RID programs for inmates sentenced to such a program prior to January 1, 2017, or devise and implement suitable alternatives for any such inmates.

HISTORY:
Laws, 2015, ch. 463, § 1, eff from and after July 1, 2015.

§ 47-5-111.
Transportation of offenders to correctional system facilities; processing of offenders at receiving stations.

The commissioner shall make suitable provision and regulations for the safe and speedy transportation of offenders from counties of their confinement to the appropriate facility of the correctional system by the sheriffs of such respective counties if such sheriffs are willing to perform such services as cheaply as the correctional system can have it done otherwise. Such transportation shall be on state account. In no instance shall the offenders be carried direct from the county jails to a correctional facility, but shall be carried to the appropriate receiving station as designated by the commissioner where the character of labor which each offender may reasonably perform shall be determined. Upon the arrival of each offender at such receiving station, the commissioner shall cause a statement to be made by the offender, giving a brief history of his life, and showing where he has resided, the names and post office addresses of his immediate relatives, and such other facts as will tend to show his past habits and character. The commissioner shall, by correspondence or otherwise, verify or disprove such statements, if practicable, and shall preserve the record and information so obtained for future reference. The commissioner shall have authority to designate such vehicles as are necessary to transport offenders.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 7940; Laws, 1964, ch. 378, § 20; Laws, 1976, ch. 440, § 54; reenacted, Laws, 1981, ch. 465, § 58; reenacted, Laws, 1984, ch. 471, § 54; reenacted, Laws, 1986, ch. 413, § 54; Laws, 1988, ch. 504, § 24, eff from and after passage (approved May 6, 1988).

§ 47-5-112.
Repealed.

Repealed by Laws of 1989, ch. 488, § 1, eff from and after July 1, 1991.

[Laws, 1977, ch. 479, § 8; Laws, 1978, ch. 447, § 1; Laws, 1979, ch. 372, § 1; reenacted, Laws, 1980, ch. 310; reenacted and amended, Laws, 1981, ch. 465, § 59; am, Laws, 1982, ch. 386; 1983, ch. 390; Laws, 1984, ch. 392; Laws, 1984, ch. 488, § 225; reenacted and amended, Laws, 1985, ch. 507; reenacted and amended, Laws, 1987, ch. 336; Laws, 1988, ch. 504, § 25; Laws, 1989, ch. 488, § 81]

§ 47-5-113.
Offenders of the United States courts.

The offenders of the courts of the United States sentenced to confinement in the state correctional system shall on delivery to the correctional system be confined in the correctional system according to their several sentences and be treated as other offenders, the United States supporting such offenders and paying the expenses of executing their sentences.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 7977; Laws, 1964, ch. 378, § 57; Laws, 1976, ch. 440, § 55; reenacted, Laws, 1981, ch. 465, § 60; reenacted, Laws, 1984, ch. 471, § 55; reenacted, Laws, 1986, ch. 413, § 55, eff from and after passage (approved March 28, 1986).

§ 47-5-115.
Offenders whose capital sentences are commuted.

Any offender who has been sentenced to suffer death, and whose sentence has been commuted by the Governor to imprisonment in the state correctional system, shall be confined in the state correctional system on order of the Governor and treated as are other offenders.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 7976; Laws, 1964, ch. 378, § 56; Laws, 1976, ch. 440, § 56; reenacted, Laws, 1981, ch. 465, § 61; reenacted, Laws, 1984, ch. 471, § 56; reenacted, Laws, 1986, ch. 413, § 56, eff from and after passage (approved March 28, 1986).

§ 47-5-116.
Installation of “Biddle guard” on vehicle transporting prisoner.

The term “Biddle guard” means a device or partition installed in a vehicle operated by a law enforcement officer which separates the front and rear passenger compartments.

It is unlawful to transport a prisoner who is committed to the Department of Corrections in a vehicle which is not equipped with a secure Biddle guard. Each prisoner shall be restrained and a state, county, municipal or private correctional facility shall not release a prisoner into the custody of a law enforcement officer unless the prisoner is being transported in a vehicle equipped in accordance with this section.

The Commissioner of Corrections, sheriff or chief law enforcement officer who is responsible for a vehicle in which any transportation in violation of this section occurs shall be assessed a civil penalty of One Thousand Five Hundred Dollars ($1,500.00) which shall be collected by the Attorney General and paid into the State Treasury.

The Commissioner of Corrections, sheriff or chief law enforcement officer who is responsible for a vehicle in which a prisoner is transported in violation of this section shall not be liable personally for any damages arising from injuries to persons or property caused by a prisoner who has escaped while being transported in violation of this section.

This section does not apply to any vehicle used by a correctional officer for transporting prisoners on the grounds of a correctional facility under the jurisdiction of the department, to any vehicle used by a field officer of the Department of Corrections when taking a prisoner into the custody of the Department of Corrections or to any vehicle used to transport prisoners in work release programs.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1989, ch. 380, § 1; Laws, 1999, ch. 525, § 1, eff from and after July 1, 1999.

§ 47-5-117.
Repealed.

Repealed by Laws of 1976, ch. 440, § 92, eff from and after July 1, 1976.

[Laws, 1964, ch. 378, § 59]

§ 47-5-119.
Initial search of offender; disposition of money found thereon; misappropriation of offender’s money.

Offenders, when received into a facility of the correctional system, shall be carefully searched. If money be found on the person of the offender, or received by him at any time, it shall be taken in charge by the commissioner and placed to the offender’s credit and expended for the offender’s benefit on his written order and under such restrictions as may be prescribed by law or the rules. If an offender with money charged to his credit shall die from any cause while in a facility of the correctional system or be discharged without claiming such money, the commissioner shall make every effort to give notice of such fact to the discharged offender or to the beneficiary or nearest-known relative, if any, of the deceased or discharged offender, and upon a valid claim presented shall pay out such money to such discharged offender, beneficiary or nearest relative. After two (2) years from the date of giving such notice, or a valid attempt to give such notice, or two (2) years after the death of such offender, if the beneficiary or nearest relative is unknown, if such money has not been validly claimed, the commissioner shall make an affidavit of such fact, which sums shall escheat to the correctional system special vocational training program fund to help in offender rehabilitation. Any officer or employee having charge of the offenders’ money who misappropriates the same, or any part thereof, shall be deemed guilty of a felony, and upon conviction thereof shall be confined in the correctional system for a term of not more than five (5) years. All sums credited to the account of an offender who shall escape shall immediately, upon the offender’s escape, escheat to the special vocational training program fund to help in offender rehabilitation.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 7947; Laws, 1964, ch. 378, § 27; Laws, 1968, ch. 378, § 1; Laws, 1976, ch. 440, § 57; reenacted, Laws, 1981, ch. 465, § 62; reenacted, Laws, 1984, ch. 471, § 57; reenacted, Laws, 1986, ch. 413, § 57, eff from and after passage (approved March 28, 1986).

§ 47-5-120.
Transfer of offender for observation, diagnosis and treatment; board of examiners established to examine condition of certain offenders.

Except as otherwise provided by law, the commissioner may transfer an offender for observation, diagnosis and treatment to another appropriate state department or institution, provided that he has given prior written notice to the administrator of the agency.

The department of corrections shall create a board of examiners, hereinafter referred to as the “board,” who shall examine and evaluate the condition of offenders who are apparently suffering from psychosis, other mental illness, or dependency or addiction to drugs. The commissioner shall refer such offenders to the board which shall make a written report of its findings pertaining to each such offender. If all members of the board determine that an offender is in need of mental treatment or can obtain benefit from the programs of treatment for drug dependency or addiction at a facility of the department of mental health, then the board may authorize his transfer for observation, diagnosis, treatment and rehabilitation after prior written notice to the administrator of the facility of the department of mental health that is to receive the offender.

The board shall be composed of the following:

A physician on the staff of the Mississippi State Hospital at Whitfield, Mississippi, or the East Mississippi State Hospital at Meridian, Mississippi;

A physician on the staff of the Mississippi Department of Corrections; and

A physician to be selected by the commissioner of corrections who is not an employee of the department of corrections or the department of mental health.

The board shall meet once each month at the correctional facility located at Parchman, Mississippi. All fees, compensation and expenses of the board shall be paid from funds appropriated to or otherwise available to the state department of corrections. The board is authorized to establish such rules and regulations as may be necessary to carry out the purposes of this section.

While the offender is in another institution, his sentence shall continue to run. When the director of the institution to which an offender has been transferred determines that the offender is not in need of treatment or has recovered from the condition which occasioned the transfer or has received the maximum benefit of treatment and rehabilitation, the commissioner shall provide for his return to the department, unless his sentence has expired, in which case he shall be issued a discharge in accordance with law.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1976, ch. 440, § 17; Laws, 1977, ch. 495, § 2; reenacted, Laws, 1981, ch. 465, § 63; reenacted, Laws, 1984, ch. 471, § 58; reenacted, Laws, 1986, ch. 413, § 58, eff from and after passage (approved March 28, 1986).

§ 47-5-121.
Separation of sexes.

All female offenders shall be kept separate and apart from male offenders. Where practicable, the commissioner shall keep the female offenders within a separate facility from the male offenders, and shall provide reasonable rules and regulations for the government of same.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 7943; Laws, 1964, ch. 378, § 23; Laws, 1976, ch. 440, § 58; reenacted, Laws, 1981, ch. 465, § 64; reenacted, Laws, 1984, ch. 471, § 59; reenacted, Laws, 1986, ch. 413, § 59, eff from and after passage (approved March 28, 1986).

§ 47-5-122.
Agricultural production as part of disciplinary or other programs; contracts for federal subsidies.

The Commissioner of Corrections may provide for agricultural production in connection with disciplinary programs, rehabilitation, inmate work projects, prison agricultural enterprise programs or any similar activity of the department; however, agricultural activities shall be conducted in a manner which are labor intensive and a minimum amount of mechanized or power-driven equipment shall be utilized to the extent practical and economically feasible.

The Department of Corrections is authorized to enter into contracts or agreements with the federal government with respect to agricultural subsidies or payments.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1986, ch. 425, § 2; Laws, 1992, ch. 506, § 5, eff from and after passage (approved May 15, 1992).

§ 47-5-123.
Repealed.

Repealed by Laws of 1976, ch. 440, § 92, eff from and after July 1, 1976.

[Laws, 1964, ch. 378, §§ 25, 22]

§ 47-5-124.
Uniform designations for offenders; restrictions on possession of radios, televisions and similar electronic devices; restrictions on weight lifting programs.

Beginning January 1, 1995, the Department of Corrections shall phase in the following uniform designations for all offenders housed by the Department of Corrections:

Maximum security offenders – Red and white horizontal stripes which are three (3) inches wide;

Medium security offenders – Black and white horizontal stripes which are three (3) inches wide; and

Minimum security offenders – Green and white horizontal stripes which are three (3) inches wide.

No offender may wear any article of clothing that is not issued to the offender by the Department of Corrections. The word “convict” must be written on the back of the shirt or other upper outer garment of clothing.

No convict incarcerated in a state correctional facility or a private correctional facility may be authorized or permitted to operate, use or have in his possession during the term of his incarceration any radio, television, record player, tape player, recorder, compact disc player, stereo or computer, except when such devices are used in a work incentive program authorized and administered by the Department of Corrections. The department shall develop and implement a plan to return such devices owned by inmates to the families of such inmates.

No state correctional facility existing on August 23, 1994, and no correctional facility, public or private, constructed or contracted for under the provisions of this chapter shall include weight lifting equipment, except when such equipment is used in a work incentive program.

An inmate is prohibited from possessing individual air conditioners. However, the Department of Finance and Administration and Department of Corrections shall determine the feasibility and cost effectiveness of heating and refrigerated air conditioning equipment for the cooling and heating of a correctional facility constructed after August 23, 1994.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1994 Ex Sess, ch. 26, § 28; Laws, 2015, ch. 463, § 4, eff from and after July 1, 2015.

§ 47-5-125.
Repealed.

Repealed by Laws of 1976, ch. 440, § 92, eff from and after July 1, 1976.

[Laws, 1964, ch. 378, §§ 25, 22]

§ 47-5-126.
Working of inmates.

All inmates, unless physically unable, shall be required to perform such work as may be set out in the policy-making board of the institution.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1976, ch. 440, § 91; reenacted, Laws, 1981, ch. 465, § 65; reenacted, Laws, 1984, ch. 471, § 60; reenacted, Laws, 1986, ch. 413, § 60, eff from and after passage (approved March 28, 1986).

§ 47-5-127.
Repealed.

Repealed by Laws of 1976, ch. 440, § 92, eff from and after July 1, 1976.

[Laws, 1964, ch. 378, § 26; Laws, 1974, ch. 539, § 25; Laws, 1975, ch. 485, § 1]

§ 47-5-128.
Repealed.

Repealed by Laws of 1984, ch. 420, § 3, eff from and after July 1, 1984.

[Laws, 1974, ch. 539, § 21; Laws, 1976, ch. 440, § 59; Laws, 1977, ch. 479, § 2; Laws, 1978, ch. 301, § 5; brought forward, Laws, 1981, ch. 465, § 66]

§ 47-5-129.
Offenders to work certain roads; Sunflower County.

Sunflower County shall have the use of not over thirty-five (35) offenders six (6) workdays of each week for the purpose of working the roads of Sunflower County. The board of supervisors of Sunflower County shall lay out and designate the roads to be worked by the offenders, and the board of supervisors shall furnish transportation to and from the Parchman facility for the offenders. The supervision and handling of offenders while working on the roads shall be under the road sergeant, it being understood that all offenders so worked on the road shall be returned to the Parchman facility at night.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 7955; Laws, 1964, ch. 378, § 35; Laws, 1976, ch. 440, § 60; reenacted, Laws, 1981, ch. 465, § 67; reenacted, Laws, 1984, ch. 471, § 61; reenacted, Laws, 1986, ch. 413, § 61, eff from and after passage (approved March 28, 1986).

§ 47-5-131.
Offenders to work certain roads; Quitman County.

Quitman County, Mississippi, shall have the use of not over twenty (20) offenders from the Parchman facility for five (5) workdays of each week for the purpose of working the roads of Quitman County. The board of supervisors of Quitman County shall lay out and designate roads to be worked by the offenders, and the board of supervisors shall furnish transportation to and from the Parchman facility for offenders.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 7956; Laws, 1964, ch. 378, § 36; Laws, 1976, ch. 440, § 61; reenacted, Laws, 1981, ch. 465, § 68; reenacted, Laws, 1984, ch. 471, § 62; reenacted, Laws, 1986, ch. 413, § 62, eff from and after passage (approved March 28, 1986).

§ 47-5-132.
Housing of prisoners; “hot racking,” tents and “double bunking.”

In addition to any other powers and duties of the Commissioner of Corrections, the commissioner is authorized to study and develop a plan for rotating bed space, known in military terms as “hot racking,” for adult offenders committed to the Department of Corrections. The plan, as determined by the commissioner, may include rotating shifts of labor, training and sleep.

In addition, the commissioner may:

In his discretion as he deems necessary to address emergency overcrowding situations, utilize military-style temporary housing facilities and infrastructure, for the incarceration of adult offenders committed to the department. Such facilities shall include tents or other temporary structures, any necessary ditches for drainage purposes, any temporary infrastructure and any other improvement or accompaniment to such structures. All such facilities shall be constructed as much as possible by adult offenders in the custody of the Department of Corrections, possessing the minimum constructions skills necessary.

In his discretion, require that any bed in the state correctional system shall be converted to a bunk bed, in order that a space occupied by a bed will consist of a bed on top of a bed, which shall be known as “double-bunking.”

HISTORY:
Laws, 1994 Ex Sess, ch. 26, § 29, eff from and after passage (approved August 23, 1994).

§ 47-5-133.
Drainage of correctional system property; restriction on working of offenders off correctional system property.

The commissioner is authorized and empowered to use the offenders on or off the property of the correctional system to drain or improve the drainage of any property belonging to the correctional system. Except as otherwise specifically provided by law, no offenders at any time are to work off property of the correctional system except: (a) when some dire calamity or disaster exists or threatens, or (b) those offenders assigned to duty at the Governor’s Mansion (eight (8)). The Governor may order offenders to work to avert or control such calamity or disaster.

Provided, however, that the commissioner may authorize the working of offenders in support of any road construction, repair or other project of the State Highway Department upon proper request therefor by the State Highway Commission. In such cases the department shall establish all proper regulations for the working, guarding, safekeeping, clothing, housing and subsistence of offenders while so working.

Provided further, that the commissioner may authorize the working and housing of offenders in support of the Mississippi Bureau of Narcotics upon proper request therefor by the bureau. In such cases the department shall establish all proper regulations for the working, guarding, safekeeping, clothing, housing and subsistence of offenders while so working.

The commissioner may authorize the working of offenders in support of any aspect of Mississippi state government where such work would be appropriate and useful.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 7964; Laws, 1964, ch. 378, § 44; Laws, 1976, ch. 440, § 62; reenacted, Laws, 1981, ch. 465, § 69; Laws, 1984, ch. 305, § 1; reenacted, Laws, 1984, ch. 471, § 63; reenacted, Laws, 1986, ch. 413, § 63; Laws, 1988, ch. 504, § 26; Laws, 1996, ch. 547, § 2, eff from and after passage (approved April 13, 1996).

§ 47-5-134.
Offenders to work for Habitat for Humanity or the Fuller Center for Housing, Inc.

The Commissioner of Corrections may authorize the working of offenders, on a voluntary basis, in support of Habitat for Humanity, Inc., or the Fuller Center for Housing, Inc., which are nonprofit organizations. However, offenders shall only be used to work on construction projects. The Department of Corrections shall establish all proper regulations for the working, guarding, safekeeping, clothing, housing and subsistence of offenders when they are working.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1997, ch. 365, § 1; Laws, 2009, ch. 428, § 1, eff from and after July 1, 2009.

§§ 47-5-135 and 47-5-136.
Repealed.

Repealed by Laws, 1983, ch. 391, § 2, eff from and after March 24, 1983.

§47-5-135. [Codes, 1942, § 7981; Laws, 1964, ch. 378, § 64; Laws, 1976, ch. 440, § 64; reenacted, Laws, 1981, ch. 465, § 70]

§47-5-136. [Codes, 1942, § 7922(b-d); Laws, 1972, ch. 468, § 1; Laws, 1976, ch. 440, § 65; reenacted, Laws, 1981, ch. 465, § 71]

§ 47-5-137.
Use of offenders as servants prohibited; exception.

Except as otherwise specifically provided by law, the use of offenders as servants, gardeners, chauffeurs, cooks, baby-sitters or domestic workers of any nature by an employee of the correctional system or by any other person in an individual household is hereby prohibited; provided, however, that the commissioner may use offenders for such work on the grounds of a facility of the correctional system.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 7960; Laws, 1964, ch. 378, § 40; Laws, 1974, ch. 539, § 26; Laws, 1976, ch. 440, § 66; reenacted, Laws, 1981, ch. 465, § 72; reenacted, Laws, 1984, ch. 471, § 64; reenacted, Laws, 1986, ch. 413, § 64; Laws, 1996, ch. 547, § 3, eff from and after passage (approved April 13, 1996).

§ 47-5-138.
Earned time allowances; earned-release supervision; promulgations of rules and regulations; forfeiture generally; release of offender; phase-out of earned time release.

The department may promulgate rules and regulations to carry out an earned time allowance program based on the good conduct and performance of an inmate. An inmate is eligible to receive an earned time allowance of one-half (1/2) of the period of confinement imposed by the court except those inmates excluded by law. When an inmate is committed to the custody of the department, the department shall determine a conditional earned time release date by subtracting the earned time allowance from an inmate’s term of sentence. This subsection does not apply to any sentence imposed after June 30, 1995.

An inmate may forfeit all or part of his earned time allowance for a serious violation of rules. No forfeiture of the earned time allowance shall be effective except upon approval of the commissioner, or his designee, and forfeited earned time may not be restored.

For the purposes of this subsection, “final order” means an order of a state or federal court that dismisses a lawsuit brought by an inmate while the inmate was in the custody of the Department of Corrections as frivolous, malicious or for failure to state a claim upon which relief could be granted.

On receipt of a final order, the department shall forfeit:

Sixty (60) days of an inmate’s accrued earned time if the department has received one (1) final order as defined herein;

One hundred twenty (120) days of an inmate’s accrued earned time if the department has received two (2) final orders as defined herein;

One hundred eighty (180) days of an inmate’s accrued earned time if the department has received three (3) or more final orders as defined herein.

The department may not restore earned time forfeited under this subsection.

An inmate who meets the good conduct and performance requirements of the earned time allowance program may be released on his conditional earned time release date.

For any sentence imposed after June 30, 1995, an inmate may receive an earned time allowance of four and one-half (4-1/2) days for each thirty (30) days served if the department determines that the inmate has complied with the good conduct and performance requirements of the earned time allowance program. The earned time allowance under this subsection shall not exceed fifteen percent (15%) of an inmate’s term of sentence; however, beginning July 1, 2006, no person under the age of twenty-one (21) who has committed a nonviolent offense, and who is under the jurisdiction of the Department of Corrections, shall be subject to the fifteen percent (15%) limitation for earned time allowances as described in this subsection (5).

Any inmate, who is released before the expiration of his term of sentence under this section, shall be placed under earned-release supervision until the expiration of the term of sentence. The inmate shall retain inmate status and remain under the jurisdiction of the department. The period of earned-release supervision shall be conducted in the same manner as a period of supervised parole. The department shall develop rules, terms and conditions for the earned-release supervision program. The commissioner shall designate the appropriate hearing officer within the department to conduct revocation hearings for inmates violating the conditions of earned-release supervision.

If the earned-release supervision is revoked, the inmate shall serve the remainder of the sentence, but the time the inmate served on earned-release supervision before revocation, shall be applied to reduce his sentence.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1977, ch. 479, § 6; brought forward, Laws, 1981, ch. 465, § 73; reenacted and amended, Laws, 1984, ch. 386; reenacted, Laws, 1984, ch. 471, § 65; Laws, 1985, ch. 531, § 2; reenacted, Laws, 1986, ch. 413, § 65; Laws, 1992, ch. 520, § 1; Laws, 1993, ch. 403, § 1; Laws, 1995, ch. 596, § 4; Laws, 1996, ch. 350, § 1; Laws, 1996, ch. 418, § 1; Laws, 1998, ch. 402, § 1; Laws, 2001, ch. 393, § 5; Laws, 2005, ch. 471, § 9; Laws, 2012, ch. 486, § 1; brought forward and amended, Laws, 2014, ch. 457, § 72, eff from and after July 1, 2014.

§ 47-5-138.1.
Trusties authorized to accumulate additional earned time; certain offenders in trusty status ineligible for time allowance.

In addition to any other administrative reduction of sentence, an offender in trusty status as defined by the classification board of the Department of Corrections may be awarded a trusty-time allowance of thirty (30) days’ reduction of sentence for each thirty (30) days of participation during any calendar month in an approved program while in trusty status, including satisfactory participation in education or instructional programs, satisfactory participation in work projects and satisfactory participation in any special incentive program.

An offender in trusty status shall not be eligible for a reduction of sentence under this section if:

The offender was sentenced to life imprisonment;

The offender was convicted as an habitual offender under Sections 99-19-81 through 99-19-87;

The offender was convicted of a sex crime;

The offender has not served the mandatory time required for parole eligibility, as prescribed under Section 47-7-3, for a conviction of robbery or attempted robbery through the display of a deadly weapon, carjacking through the display of a deadly weapon or a drive-by shooting; or

The offender was convicted of trafficking in controlled substances under Section 41-29-139.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1999, ch. 515, § 1; Laws, 2001, ch. 393, § 6; Laws, 2001, ch. 478, § 1; Laws, 2004, ch. 456, § 1; Laws, 2010, ch. 470, § 2; Laws, 2014, ch. 457, § 41, eff from and after July 1, 2014.

§ 47-5-139.
Certain inmates ineligible for earned time allowance; commutation to be based on total term of sentences; forfeiture of earned time in event of escape.

An inmate shall not be eligible for the earned time allowance if:

The inmate was sentenced to life imprisonment; but an inmate, except an inmate sentenced to life imprisonment for capital murder, who has reached the age of sixty-five (65) or older and who has served at least fifteen (15) years may petition the sentencing court for conditional release;

The inmate was convicted as a habitual offender under Sections 99-19-81 through 99-19-87;

The inmate has forfeited his earned time allowance by order of the commissioner;

The inmate was convicted of a sex crime; or

The inmate has not served the mandatory time required for parole eligibility for a conviction of robbery or attempted robbery with a deadly weapon.

An offender under two (2) or more consecutive sentences shall be allowed commutation based upon the total term of the sentences.

All earned time shall be forfeited by the inmate in the event of escape and/or aiding and abetting an escape. The commissioner may restore all or part of the earned time if the escapee returns to the institution voluntarily, without expense to the state, and without act of violence while a fugitive from the facility.

Any officer or employee who shall willfully violate the provisions of this section and be convicted therefor shall be removed from office or employment.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 7944; Laws, 1964, ch. 378, § 24; Laws, 1971, ch. 524, § 12; Laws, 1973, ch. 357, § 1; Laws, 1974, ch. 539, § 29; Laws, 1975, ch. 485, §§ 2, 5; Laws, 1976, ch. 389; Laws, 1976, ch. 440, § 67; Laws, 1977, ch. 479, § 3; reenacted, Laws, 1981, ch. 465, § 74; Laws, 1981, ch. 502, § 10; Laws, 1982, ch. 431, § 2; reenacted, Laws, 1984, ch. 471, § 66; reenacted, Laws, 1986, ch. 413, § 66; Laws, 1992, ch. 520, § 2; Laws, 1994 Ex Sess, ch. 25, § 6; Laws, 1995, ch. 596, § 5, eff from and after June 30, 1995.

§ 47-5-140.
Earned time handbook.

Each county attorney, district attorney, each member of the Parole Board and circuit judge shall be provided a copy of a handbook prepared by the commissioner which shall include a copy of Section 47-5-138 and Section 47-5-139, and shall clearly show how such sections would apply to an offender sentenced to terms of various lengths. Each offender shall be provided a copy of the handbook upon arrival at the correctional system and have it explained to him as a part of his initial orientation.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1975, ch. 485, § 4; Laws, 1976, ch. 440, § 68; reenacted, Laws, 1981, ch. 465, § 75; reenacted, Laws, 1984, ch. 471, § 67; reenacted, Laws, 1986, ch. 413, § 67; Laws, 1992, ch. 520, § 3, eff from and after passage (approved May 14, 1992).

§ 47-5-141.
Repealed.

Repealed by Laws, 1983, ch. 391, § 2, eff from and after March 24, 1983.

[Codes, 1942, § 7985; Laws, 1964, ch. 378, § 65; Laws, 1966, ch. 543, § 1; Laws, 1973, ch. 327, § 1; Laws, 1976, ch. 440, § 69; reenacted, Laws, 1981, ch. 465, § 76; en, Laws, 1982, ch. 431, § 3]

§ 47-5-142.
Meritorious earned time.

In order to provide incentive for offenders to achieve positive and worthwhile accomplishments for their personal benefit or the benefit of others, and in addition to any other administrative reductions of the length of an offender’s sentence, any offender shall be eligible, subject to the provisions of this section, to receive meritorious earned time as distinguished from earned time for good conduct and performance.

Subject to approval by the commissioner of the terms and conditions of the program or project, meritorious earned time may be awarded for the following: (a) successful completion of educational or instructional programs; (b) satisfactory participation in work projects; and (c) satisfactory participation in any special incentive program.

The programs and activities through which meritorious earned time may be received shall be published in writing and posted in conspicuous places at all facilities of the department and such publication shall be made available to all offenders in the custody of the department.

The commissioner shall make a determination of the number of days of reduction of sentence which may be awarded an offender as meritorious earned time for participation in approved programs or projects; the number of days shall be determined by the commissioner on the basis of each particular program or project.

No offender shall be awarded any meritorious earned time while assigned to the maximum security facilities for disciplinary purposes.

All meritorious earned time shall be forfeited by the offender in the event of escape and/or aiding and abetting an escape.

Any officer or employee of the department who shall willfully violate the provisions of this section and be convicted therefor shall be removed from office or employment.

An offender may forfeit all or any part of his meritorious earned time allowance for just cause upon the written order of the commissioner or his designee. Any meritorious earned time allowance forfeited under this section shall not be restored nor shall it be re-earned by the offender.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1985, ch. 531, § 1; Laws, 1992, ch. 520, § 4; Laws, 2009, ch. 316, § 1; brought forward without change, Laws, 2014, ch. 457, § 73, eff from and after July 1, 2014.

§§ 47-5-143 and 47-5-145.
Repealed.

Repealed by Laws, 1976, ch. 440, § 92, eff from and after July 1, 1976.

§47-5-143. [Laws, 1964, ch. 378, § 45; Laws, 1971, ch. 524, § 10]

§47-5-145. [Laws, 1964, ch. 378, § 48]